California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 3, commencing with Section 7574.18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conduct of Business [7574.20. - 7574.23.]

7574.20.

No proprietary private security employer shall sublet proprietary private security officers employed by them to any other person, business, or entity. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employer from transferring employees from one location to another or from one subsidiary to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.23.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.21.

A person registered as a proprietary private security employer shall do the following with respect to proprietary private security officers in their employment:

(a) Maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each proprietary private security officer, and the date of termination of employment when a proprietary private security officer is terminated.

(b) Maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each proprietary private security officer of the training described in Section 7574.18.

(c) The records required pursuant to this section shall be made available to the bureau
 upon demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.22.

A person registered as a proprietary private security officer shall carry on their person, while on duty, a valid and current proprietary private security officer’s registration card or a hard copy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s internet website and either a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code or a valid identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code. The registration shall be shown to any peace officer or bureau representative upon demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 5.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.23.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 4, commencing with Section 7574.20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement and Disciplinary Proceedings [7574.30. - 7574.40.]

7574.30.

(a) Pursuant to Section 125.9, the director may issue a citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, for a violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Pursuant to Section 148, the director may issue an administrative citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, to an unregistered person who is acting as a proprietary private security officer without a valid registration or to a person who is acting as a proprietary private security employer without a valid registration.

(c) The fine for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (e) of Section 7574.38 shall be five hundred
 dollars ($500) per violation.

(d) The fine for violating subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 7574.38 shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.

(e) The fine for violating subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 7574.39 shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.

(f) The fine for violating subdivision (b) of Section 7574.39 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 6.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.31.

(a) The registration of a proprietary private security officer shall be automatically suspended if the officer is convicted of any crime that is substantially related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a proprietary private security officer. 

(b) The automatic suspension shall be effectuated by the mailing of a notice of conviction and suspension of license to be sent by the bureau to the registrant at their address of record. The notice shall contain a statement of preliminary determination by the director or their designee that the crime stated is reasonably related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a proprietary private security officer. 

(c) Upon
 proper request by the proprietary private security officer, a hearing shall be convened before the private security disciplinary review committee, as specified in Section 7581.3, for a determination as to whether the automatic suspension shall be made permanent or whether the registration shall be revoked or the officer otherwise disciplined.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 8.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.32.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of Section 7574.10 is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code when either of the following applies:

(1) A complaint or a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code is filed in court charging the offense as an infraction unless the defendant, at the time he or she is arraigned, after being advised of his or her rights, elects to have the case proceed as a misdemeanor.

(2) The court, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecution, determines that the offense is an infraction
 in which event the case shall proceed as if the defendant has been arraigned on an infraction complaint.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a violation of Section 7574.10 if the defendant has had his or her registration previously revoked or suspended.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of Section 7574.10, which is an infraction, is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). No portion of the minimum fine may be suspended by the court unless as a condition of that suspension the defendant is required to submit proof of a current valid registration pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.34.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.33.

(a) A person registered with the department under this chapter may request a review by a private security disciplinary review committee, as established in Section 7581.1, to contest the assessment of an administrative fine or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension of a registration unless the denial, revocation, or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

A request for a review shall be by written notice to the department within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment, denial, revocation, or suspension.

Following a review by a disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be
 notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.

If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by a disciplinary review committee, he or she may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A request for a hearing following a decision by a disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the department within 30 days following notice of the committee’s decision.

If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the review committee’s decision shall become final.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), where a hearing is held under this chapter to determine whether an application for registration should be granted, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 7574.34.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.34.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 741)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 5, commencing with Section 7574.30.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.35.

The fee for an endorsed verification of registration shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The verification document shall include the registration number the registration history and current status, the date of the endorsement, an embossed seal, and the signature of the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 13.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.36.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of any person licensed to do business as a corporation or limited liability company in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board after notice from the bureau shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee by operation of law. The bureau shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both, and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the bureau that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the
 suspension by providing proof satisfactory to the bureau that the license is properly registered and in good standing and the payment of the reinstatement fee as prescribed by this chapter.

(b) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to this section shall be 25 percent of the renewal fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 14.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.37.

(a) A person registered as a proprietary private security employer shall deliver to the director a written report describing the circumstances surrounding any physical altercation by a registered proprietary private security officer with a member of the public while on duty and while acting within the course and scope of their employment within seven business days after the qualifying incident.

(b) For purposes of this section, a report shall be required only for physical altercations that result in any of the following:

(1) The arrest of a proprietary private security officer.

(2) The filing of a police report by a
 member of the public.

(3) A member of the public requiring any type of first aid or other medical attention.

(4) The discharge, suspension, or reprimand of a proprietary private security officer by their employer.

(5) Any physical use of force or violence on any person while on duty.

(c) The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was conducted. 

(d) A report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.

(e) A report shall not be required when a proprietary
 private security officer or multiple proprietary security officers are requested by hospital staff to assist in restraining a patient by either holding the patient or limiting the movement of the patient for medical or mental health reasons.

(f) The failure to deliver a report to the director shall be subject to a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 9.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.38.

A proprietary private security employer shall not do any of the following:

(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each proprietary private security officer, and the date of termination of employment when a proprietary private security officer is terminated as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.21.

(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each proprietary private security officer of the trainings required by Section 7574.18.

(c) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each
 employee who is subject to registration.

(d) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon, including any electronic control device, stun gun, baton, or any chemical agent, including pepper spray.

(e) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee the review or practice training required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 10.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.39.

No person required to be registered as a proprietary private security officer pursuant to this chapter shall do any of the following:

(a) Fail to carry on their person, while on duty, a valid and current proprietary private security officer registration card, or, if pending receipt of the registration card after the bureau’s approval, a hard copy printout of the approved proprietary private security officer registration information from the bureau’s internet website and a valid picture identification pursuant to Section 7583.17.

(b) Carry a firearm or other deadly weapon, including any electronic control device, stun gun, baton, or any chemical agent, including pepper spray.

(c) Fail to report to their employer any physical altercation with a member of the public while on duty and while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 11.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.40.

Notwithstanding the assessment or payment of fines for any violations of this chapter, the director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this chapter if they determine that the proprietary private security employer, responsible person of the proprietary private security employer, or registered proprietary private security officer has done any of the following:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement of a license.

(b) Violated any provisions of this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the director adopted pursuant to the authority
 contained in this chapter.

(d) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(e) Impersonated, or permitted or aided and abetted an employee to impersonate, a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(f) Committed or permitted any employee to commit any act, while the license was expired, that would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(g) Committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or used force or violence on any person, without proper justification or any use of force in violation of the
 standards prescribed by the bureau by regulation.

(h) Been convicted of a violation of Section 148 of the Penal Code.

(i) Committed any act that is a ground for denial of an application for a license under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 12.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Review [7576. - 7576.]

7576.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 28.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Private Security Services [7580. - 7588.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [7580. - 7580.15.]

7580.

This chapter may be cited as the Private Security Services Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.1.

As used in this chapter, “director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs, unless the context indicates otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.2.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.3.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, corporation, and participating tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.4.

As used in this chapter, “bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.5.

As used in this chapter, “chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.6.

As used in this chapter, “licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter and includes, but is not limited to, private patrol operator and armored contract carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.7.

(a) As used in this chapter, “qualified manager” means the individual under whose direction, control, charge, or management the business of a licensee is operated, who has qualified pursuant to Section 7582.22, and who is in possession of a current and valid qualified manager’s certificate issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.8.

As used in this chapter, “employer” means a person who employs an individual for wages or salary, lists the individual on the employer’s payroll records, and withholds all legally required deductions and contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.9.

As used in this chapter, “employee” means an individual who works for an employer, is listed on the employer’s payroll records, and is under the employer’s direction and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.10.

As used in this chapter, “employer-employee” relationship means a relationship in which an individual works for another, the individual’s name appears on the payroll records of the employer, and the employee is under the direction and control of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.11.

As used in this chapter, “firearm permit” includes “firearms permit,” “firearms qualification card,” “firearms qualification,” and “firearms qualification permit.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.12.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the director may be exercised by any other officer or employee of the Department of Consumer Affairs authorized by the director, but the director shall have the supervision of and the responsibility for all powers and duties exercised by these officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.13.

The director may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act and subject to the provisions of Section 159.5, appoint and fix the compensation of inspectors, investigators, and other personnel as may be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.14.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as entitling any person to practice law in this state unless he or she is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.15.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Federally recognized tribe” means a tribe located in this state and included on the list published in the Federal Register pursuant to the Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131) and includes an entity controlled by and established for the benefit of one or more tribes.

(2) “Participating tribe” means a federally recognized tribe that formally applies for licensure from the bureau pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The bureau shall license a federally recognized tribe that applies for licensure and is otherwise compliant
 with the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of engaging in a business regulated by this chapter. 

(c) This chapter is not intended to infringe upon or diminish the existing rights, privileges, and immunities of federally recognized tribes as set forth in federal, state, or tribal law, or the jurisdiction of those participating tribes.

(d) This chapter does not confer upon the bureau or director any rights or authority to regulate any activity within the jurisdiction of a participating tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 30.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [7581. - 7581.6.]

7581.

The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules, as follows:

(a) Classifying licensees according to the type of business regulated by this chapter in which they are engaged, including, but not limited to, persons employed by any lawful business as security guards or patrolpersons, and armored contract carriers and limiting the field and scope of the operations of a licensee to those in which he or she is classified and qualified to engage.

(b) Fixing the qualifications of licensees and managers, in addition to those prescribed in this chapter, necessary to promote and protect the public welfare.

(c) Carrying out generally the provisions of this chapter, including regulation of the conduct of licensees.

(d) Establishing the qualifications that any person employed by a private patrol operator or any lawful business as a security guard or patrolperson, or employed by an armored contract carrier, must meet as a condition of becoming eligible to carry firearms pursuant to Section 26030 of the Penal Code.

(e) Requiring each uniformed employee of a private patrol operator and each armored vehicle guard, as defined in this chapter, and any other person employed and compensated by a private patrol operator or any lawful business as a security guard or patrolperson and who in the course of this employment carries a deadly weapon to be registered with the bureau upon application on a form prescribed by the director
 accompanied by the registration fee and by two classifiable sets of fingerprints of the applicant or its equivalent as determined by the director and approved by the Department of Justice, establishing the term of the registration for a period of not less than two nor more than four years, and providing for the renewal thereof upon proper application and payment of the renewal fee. The director may, after opportunity for a hearing, refuse this registration to any person who lacks good moral character, and may impose reasonable additional requirements as are necessary to meet local needs that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(f) Establishing procedures whereby the local authorities of any city, county, or city and county may file charges with, or any person in this state, may file a complaint with the director alleging that any licensed private patrol operator, registered security guard, or patrolperson, or anyone who is
 an applicant for registration or licensure with the bureau, fails to meet standards for registration or licensure, or violates any provision of this chapter, and providing further for the investigation of the charges and a response to the charging or complaining party in the manner described in subdivision (b) of Section 129.

(g) Requiring private patrol operators and any lawful business to maintain detailed records identifying all firearms in their possession or under their control, and the employees or persons authorized to carry or have access to those firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 3.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.1.

The Governor shall appoint two private security disciplinary review committees, and may remove any member of a disciplinary review committee for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. One committee shall meet in the southern portion of the state and the other committee shall meet in the northern portion of the state.

Each disciplinary review committee shall consist of five members. Of the five members, one member shall be actively engaged in the business of a licensed private patrol operator, one member shall be actively engaged in the business of a firearm training facility, one member shall be actively engaged in the business of a registered security guard, and two members shall be public members. None of the public members shall be licensees or registrants or engaged in any business or profession in which any part of the fees, compensation, or revenue thereof, is derived from any licensee.

Each committee shall meet every 60 days or more or less frequently as may be required. The members shall be paid per diem pursuant to Section 103 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses. The members shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.2.

(a) Each disciplinary review committee shall perform the following functions as they pertain to private patrol operators, security guards, firearm qualification cardholders, baton permitholders, firearm training facilities, firearm training instructors, baton training facilities, and baton training instructors, as licensed, permitted, certified, or registered by the bureau under this chapter, and proprietary security officers, as registered by the bureau under Chapter 11.4 (commencing with Section 7574):

(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions that concern administrative fines assessed by the director.

(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed
 decisions that concern denials, revocations, or suspensions of a license, certificate, or registration except denials, revocations, or suspensions ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 14.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.3.

(a) A private patrol operator, qualified manager of a private patrol operator, security guard, firearm qualification cardholder, baton permitholder, firearm training facility, firearm training instructor, baton training facility, or baton training instructor may request a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the assessment of an administrative fine or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, certificate, or registration unless the denial, revocation, or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) A request for a review shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days
 of the issuance of the citation and assessment, denial, revocation, or suspension.

(c) Following a review by a disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.

(d) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by a disciplinary review committee, they may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A request for a hearing following a decision by a disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days following notice of the committee’s decision.

(e) If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the review committee’s decision shall become final.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 16.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.4.

Except in cases where licensees are required to comply with the provisions of Section 7581.3, where a hearing is held under this chapter to determine whether an application for a license should be granted or to determine the qualifications of a licensee’s manager, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.5.

The director shall furnish, at least once every two years, one copy of the current licensing law, rules, and regulations to every licensed business governed under this chapter, without charge. The director may charge and collect a fee equivalent to the cost of producing these documents for each additional copy which may be furnished upon request to any licensee or any applicant for licensure and for each copy furnished on request to any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 128.5 of the Business and Professions Code, that the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance of funds greater than the amount necessary to fund operating expenses of the bureau and that the bureau shall periodically review fees pursuant to this chapter to evaluate the appropriateness of each fee and the regulatory costs associated with each fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 31.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation, Licensing, and Registration [7582. - 7582.28.]

7582.

No person shall engage in a business regulated by this chapter; act or assume to act as, or represent himself or herself to be, a licensee unless he or she is licensed under this chapter; and no person shall falsely represent that he or she is employed by a licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.05.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person engaging in a business as a private patrol operator who violates Section 7582 is guilty of an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code under either of the following circumstances:

(1) A complaint or a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code is filed in court charging the offense as an infraction unless the defendant, at the time he or she is arraigned, after being advised of his or her rights, elects to have the case proceed as a misdemeanor.

(2) The court, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecution, determines that the offense is an infraction in which event the case shall proceed as if the defendant has been arraigned on an infraction complaint.

(b) This section does not apply to a violation of Section 7582 if the defendant has had his or her license previously revoked or suspended.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of Section 7582, which is an infraction, is punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000). No portion of the fine may be suspended by the court unless as a condition of that suspension the defendant is required to submit proof of a current valid license for the profession of private patrol operator which was the basis for his or her conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.1.

(a) A private patrol operator, or operator of a private patrol service, within the meaning of this chapter is a person, other than an armored contract carrier, who, for any consideration whatsoever:

Agrees to furnish, or furnishes, a watchman, guard, patrolperson, or other person to protect persons or property or to prevent the theft, unlawful taking, loss, embezzlement, misappropriation, or concealment of any goods, wares, merchandise, money, bonds, stocks, notes, documents, papers, or property of any kind; or performs the service of a watchman, guard, patrolperson, or other person, for any of these purposes.

(b) (1) A person licensed as a private patrol
 operator only may not make any investigation or investigations except those that are incidental to the theft, loss, embezzlement, misappropriation, or concealment of any property, or any other thing enumerated in this section that they have been hired or engaged to protect, guard, or watch.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any federally recognized tribe performing investigative functions within the jurisdiction of a federally recognized tribe, consistent with federal or tribal law.

(c) An armored contract carrier within the meaning of this chapter is a contract carrier operating armored vehicles pursuant to California Highway Patrol and Public Utilities Commission authority.

(d) An armored vehicle guard within the meaning of this chapter is any person employed by an armored contract carrier who in the course of
 that employment carries a deadly weapon.

(e) A security guard or security officer, within the meaning of this chapter, is an employee of a private patrol operator, or an employee of a lawful business or public agency who is not exempted pursuant to Section 7582.2, who performs the functions as described in subdivision (a) on or about the premises owned or controlled by the customer of the private patrol operator or by the guard’s employer or in the company of persons being protected.

(f) A street patrolperson, within the meaning of this chapter, is a security guard or security officer employed by a private patrol operator who performs the functions described in subdivision (a) by street patrol service utilizing foot patrol, motor patrol, or other means of transportation in public areas, streets or public thoroughfares in order to serve multiple customers. “Street patrolperson”
 does not include management or supervisory employees of the private patrol operator moving from one customer location to another to inspect personnel or security guard or security officers.

(g) This section shall not limit the ability of a participating tribe to do either of the following:

(1) Perform for itself any services set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) Perform other investigative functions within the jurisdiction of a federally recognized tribe, consistent with federal or tribal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 31.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.2.

This chapter does not apply to the following:

(a) A person who does not meet the requirements to be a proprietary private security officer, as defined in Section 7574.01, and is employed exclusively and regularly by an employer who does not provide contract security services for other entities or persons, in connection with the affairs of the employer only and where there exists an employer-employee relationship if that person at no time carries or uses a deadly weapon in the performance of that person’s duties. For purposes of this subdivision, “deadly weapon” is defined to include an instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, a dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other firearm, a knife having a blade longer
 than five inches, a razor with an unguarded blade, and a metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club.

(b) An officer or employee of the United States or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of the officer’s or employee’s official duties, including uniformed peace officers employed part time by a public agency pursuant to a written agreement between a chief of police or sheriff and the public agency, provided the part-time employment does not exceed 50 hours in any calendar month. 

(c) Patrol special police officers appointed by the police commission of a city, county, or city and county under the express terms of its charter who also under the express terms of the charter (1) are subject to suspension or dismissal after a hearing on charges duly filed with the commission after a fair and impartial
 trial, (2) must be not less than 18 years of age nor more than 40 years of age, (3) must possess physical qualifications prescribed by the commission, and (4) are designated by the police commission as the owners of a certain beat or territory as may be fixed from time to time by the police commission. 
